src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pl.aff
SFX e Y 25
SFX e    c         kni to   l c
SFX e   0         zono      [il]ec
SFX e   c          ono      rz[ey]c
SFX e   0         zono       uc
SFX e             no        [^ ei uy ] 
SFX e              to       [dijl ]  
SFX e             i to      [^sz]n  
SFX e   zn         ni to    zn  
SFX e   sn         ni to    sn  
SFX e   e         ano       cie 
SFX e   le        ielono    le 
SFX e   e         ano       rze 
SFX e   e         ano       [^csz]ie 
SFX e   e         ano       sie 
SFX e   e         ano       zie 
SFX e             to        [^ac]i 
SFX e   i         jono      [ae]i 
SFX e   i         ono       ci 
SFX e             siono     pa  
SFX e              siono    z   
SFX e             siono     nie  
SFX e             dziono    wie  
SFX e            odzono      
SFX e             to        [uy] 
SFX e             ziono       

SFX j Y 200
SFX j    c         kni cia  l c
SFX j    c         kni cie  l c
SFX j    c         kni ciach l c
SFX j    c         kni ciami l c
SFX j    c         kni ciem l c
SFX j    c         kni ciom l c
SFX j    c         kni ciu  l c
SFX j    c         kni      l c
SFX j   0         zenia     [il]ec
SFX j   0         zenie     [il]ec
SFX j   0         zeniach   [il]ec
SFX j   0         zeniami   [il]ec
SFX j   0         zeniem    [il]ec
SFX j   0         zeniom    [il]ec
SFX j   0         zeniu     [il]ec
SFX j   0         ze        [il]ec
SFX j   c          enia     rz[ey]c
SFX j   c          enie     rz[ey]c
SFX j   c          eniach   rz[ey]c
SFX j   c          eniami   rz[ey]c
SFX j   c          eniem    rz[ey]c
SFX j   c          eniom    rz[ey]c
SFX j   c          eniu     rz[ey]c
SFX j   c          e        rz[ey]c
SFX j   0         zenia      uc
SFX j   0         zenie      uc
SFX j   0         zeniach    uc
SFX j   0         zeniami    uc
SFX j   0         zeniem     uc
SFX j   0         zeniom     uc
SFX j   0         zeniu      uc
SFX j   0         ze         uc
SFX j             nia       [^ ei uy ] 
SFX j             nie       [^ ei uy ] 
SFX j             niem      [^ ei uy ] 
SFX j             niu       [^ ei uy ] 
SFX j             niami     [^ ei uy ] 
SFX j             niom      [^ ei uy ] 
SFX j             niach     [^ ei uy ] 
SFX j                       [^ ei uy ] 
SFX j              cia      [dijl ]  
SFX j              cie      [dijl ]  
SFX j              ciem     [dijl ]  
SFX j              ciu      [dijl ]  
SFX j              ciami    [dijl ]  
SFX j              ciom     [dijl ]  
SFX j              ciach    [dijl ]  
SFX j                       [dijl ]  
SFX j             i cia     [^sz]n  
SFX j             i cie     [^sz]n  
SFX j             i ciem    [^sz]n  
SFX j             i ciu     [^sz]n  
SFX j             i ciami   [^sz]n  
SFX j             i ciom    [^sz]n  
SFX j             i ciach   [^sz]n  
SFX j             i         [^sz]n  
SFX j   zn         ni cia   zn  
SFX j   zn         ni cie   zn  
SFX j   zn         ni ciem  zn  
SFX j   zn         ni ciu   zn  
SFX j   zn         ni ciami zn  
SFX j   zn         ni ciom  zn  
SFX j   zn         ni ciach zn  
SFX j   zn         ni       zn  
SFX j   sn         ni cia   sn  
SFX j   sn         ni cie   sn  
SFX j   sn         ni ciem  sn  
SFX j   sn         ni ciu   sn  
SFX j   sn         ni ciami sn  
SFX j   sn         ni ciom  sn  
SFX j   sn         ni ciach sn  
SFX j   sn         ni       sn  
SFX j   ie        enia      cie 
SFX j   ie        enie      cie 
SFX j   ie        eniem     cie 
SFX j   ie        eniu      cie 
SFX j   ie        eniami    cie 
SFX j   ie        eniom     cie 
SFX j   ie        eniach    cie 
SFX j   ie        e         cie 
SFX j   le        ielenia   le 
SFX j   le        ielenie   le 
SFX j   le        ieleniach le 
SFX j   le        ieleniami le 
SFX j   le        ieleniem  le 
SFX j   le        ieleniom  le 
SFX j   le        ieleniu   le 
SFX j   le        iele      le 
SFX j   e         enia      rze 
SFX j   e         enie      rze 
SFX j   e         eniach    rze 
SFX j   e         eniami    rze 
SFX j   e         eniem     rze 
SFX j   e         eniom     rze 
SFX j   e         eniu      rze 
SFX j   e         e         rze 
SFX j             nia       [^csz]ie 
SFX j             nie       [^csz]ie 
SFX j             niem      [^csz]ie 
SFX j             niu       [^csz]ie 
SFX j             niami     [^csz]ie 
SFX j             niom      [^csz]ie 
SFX j             niach     [^csz]ie 
SFX j                       [^csz]ie 
SFX j   ie        zenia     sie 
SFX j   ie        zenie     sie 
SFX j   ie        zeniem    sie 
SFX j   ie        zeniu     sie 
SFX j   ie        zeniami   sie 
SFX j   ie        zeniom    sie 
SFX j   ie        zeniach   sie 
SFX j   ie        ze        sie 
SFX j   ie        enia      zie 
SFX j   ie        enie      zie 
SFX j   ie        eniem     zie 
SFX j   ie        eniu      zie 
SFX j   ie        eniami    zie 
SFX j   ie        eniom     zie 
SFX j   ie        eniach    zie 
SFX j   ie        e         zie 
SFX j             cia       [^ac]i 
SFX j             cie       [^ac]i 
SFX j             ciem      [^ac]i 
SFX j             ciu       [^ac]i 
SFX j             ciami     [^ac]i 
SFX j             ciom      [^ac]i 
SFX j             ciach     [^ac]i 
SFX j                       [^ac]i 
SFX j   i         jenia     [ae]i 
SFX j   i         jenie     [ae]i 
SFX j   i         jeniem    [ae]i 
SFX j   i         jeniu     [ae]i 
SFX j   i         jeniami   [ae]i 
SFX j   i         jeniom    [ae]i 
SFX j   i         jeniach   [ae]i 
SFX j   i         je        [ae]i 
SFX j   i         enia      ci 
SFX j   i         enie      ci 
SFX j   i         eniem     ci 
SFX j   i         eniu      ci 
SFX j   i         eniami    ci 
SFX j   i         eniom     ci 
SFX j   i         eniach    ci 
SFX j   i         e         ci 
SFX j             sienia    pa  
SFX j             sienie    pa  
SFX j             sieniem   pa  
SFX j             sieniu    pa  
SFX j             sieniami  pa  
SFX j             sieniom   pa  
SFX j             sieniach  pa  
SFX j             sie       pa  
SFX j              sienia   z   
SFX j              sienie   z   
SFX j              sieniem  z   
SFX j              sieniu   z   
SFX j              sieniami z   
SFX j              sieniom  z   
SFX j              sieniach z   
SFX j              sie      z   
SFX j             sienia    nie  
SFX j             sienie    nie  
SFX j             sieniem   nie  
SFX j             sieniu    nie  
SFX j             sieniami  nie  
SFX j             sieniom   nie  
SFX j             sieniach  nie  
SFX j             sie       nie  
SFX j             dzenia    wie  
SFX j             dzenie    wie  
SFX j             dzeniem   wie  
SFX j             dzeniu    wie  
SFX j             dzeniami  wie  
SFX j             dzeniom   wie  
SFX j             dzeniach  wie  
SFX j             dze       wie  
SFX j            odzenia     
SFX j            odzenie     
SFX j            odzeniem    
SFX j            odzeniu     
SFX j            odzeniami   
SFX j            odzeniom    
SFX j            odzeniach   
SFX j            odze        
SFX j             cia       [uy] 
SFX j             cie       [uy] 
SFX j             ciem      [uy] 
SFX j             ciu       [uy] 
SFX j             ciami     [uy] 
SFX j             ciom      [uy] 
SFX j             ciach     [uy] 
SFX j                       [uy] 
SFX j             zienia      
SFX j             zienie      
SFX j             zieniem     
SFX j             zieniu      
SFX j             zieniami    
SFX j             zieniom     
SFX j             zieniach    
SFX j             zie         

SFX m Y 53
SFX m   ba        eb        [^ o  ]ba
SFX m    ba        b         ba
SFX m   oba        b        oba
SFX m   o ba       b       o ba
SFX m   o ba       b       o ba
SFX m   ca        iec       [^s]ca
SFX m   ca        ec        sca
SFX m   oda        d        oda
SFX m   ga        eg        [^ or]ga
SFX m    ga        g         ga
SFX m   oga        g        oga
SFX m   orga       rg       orga
SFX m   cia                 cia
SFX m   nia                 [^djh t]nia
SFX m   nia       zie       dnia
SFX m   nia       en        [hj]nia
SFX m    nia      sien       nia
SFX m   nia       e         tnia
SFX m   sia                 sia
SFX m   zia                 zia
SFX m   oja        j        oja
SFX m   ka        ek        [^  o  ]ka
SFX m    ka       ciek       ka
SFX m    ka        k         ka
SFX m    ka       niek       ka
SFX m    ka       siek       ka
SFX m    ka       ziek       ka
SFX m   la        el        [^o]la
SFX m   ola        l        ola
SFX m    a        e         [^ogk] a
SFX m    a        ie        [gk] a
SFX m   o a                o a
SFX m   ma        em        [^ ]ma
SFX m    ma       ciem       ma
SFX m   na        en        [^mnow]na
SFX m   na        ien       [mnw]na
SFX m   opa        p        opa
SFX m   ra        er        [^gkot]ra
SFX m   ra        ier       [gk]ra
SFX m   ora        r        ora
SFX m   ra        er        astra
SFX m   ostra      str      ostra
SFX m   ota        t        ota
SFX m   wa        ew        [^ko]wa
SFX m   wa        iew       kwa
SFX m   owa        w        owa
SFX m   za        ez        [^dor]za
SFX m   oza        z        oza
SFX m   odza       dz       odza
SFX m   orza       rz       orza
SFX m   o a                o a
SFX m    a        e         [^ ] a
SFX m   ni                  ni

SFX C Y 18
SFX C    c         cy        c
SFX C   e         ci        [^i]e 
SFX C   ie        ci        ie 
SFX C   el        li        [^i]el
SFX C   iel       li        iel
SFX C    l        oli        l
SFX C   in        0         nin
SFX C   e         ni        [^i]e 
SFX C   cie       tni       cie 
SFX C   ie        ni        [pg]ie 
SFX C   sie        ni       sie 
SFX C   zie       ni        dzie 
SFX C    dz        dzy      ni dz
SFX C    dz        y       si dz
SFX C    d         dzi       d 
SFX C    d       o dzi      d 
SFX C              y         
SFX C            o y        

SFX n Y 5
SFX n   a         0         [^ij]a
SFX n   ja        yj        [^aeijo uy]ja
SFX n   a         0         [aeijo uy]ja
SFX n   ia        ij        [^drt]ia
SFX n   ia        yj        [drt]ia

SFX A Y 22
SFX A   iew       wie       [gk]iew
SFX A   ew        wie       [hnrt]ew
SFX A   a         e         a
SFX A   0         e         ni
SFX A   0         e         [cj]
SFX A   0         e         [^ ]l
SFX A    l        ole        l
SFX A             zie       [^ d] 
SFX A             zie       [^  ]d 
SFX A    d         dzie      d 
SFX A    d        odzie      d 
SFX A              zie        
SFX A             cie       [^e] 
SFX A             cie       [^h ]e 
SFX A   e         cie       [h ]e 
SFX A   0         e         [^ ] 
SFX A              e         
SFX A             nie        
SFX A             sie       [ou] 
SFX A             sie       [^w]ie 
SFX A   ie        sie       wie 
SFX A   0         e         z

SFX N Y 24
SFX N   0         om        [^a  o  x]
SFX N   a         om        a
SFX N             ciom       
SFX N             niom       
SFX N   0         m         o
SFX N             siom       
SFX N   x         ksom      x
SFX N             ziom       
SFX N   0         ami       [^a  o  x]
SFX N   0         mi        a
SFX N             ciami      
SFX N             niami      
SFX N   o         ami       o
SFX N             siami      
SFX N   x         ksami     x
SFX N             ziami      
SFX N   0         ach       [^a  o  x]
SFX N   0         ch        a
SFX N             ciach      
SFX N   o         ach       o
SFX N             niach      
SFX N             siach      
SFX N   x         ksach     x
SFX N             ziach      
